Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 653.020 is amended to read:
653.020. ORS 653.010 to 653.261 do not apply to any of the following employees:
(1) An individual employed in agriculture if:
(a) Such individual is employed as a hand harvest or pruning laborer and is paid on a piece-rate
basis in an operation which has  been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having been,
paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment and is employed by an employer who did not,
during any calendar quarter during the preceding year, use more  than 500 piece-rate-work-days of
agricultural  labor;
(b) Such individual is the parent, spouse, child or other member of the employer’s  immediate
family;
(c) Such individual:
(A) Is employed as a  hand harvest or pruning laborer and is paid on a piece-rate basis in an
operation which has been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having been, paid  on a
piece-rate basis in the region of employment;
(B) Commutes daily from a  permanent residence to the farm on which the individual is so em-
ployed; and
(C) Has been employed in agricultural labor less than 13 weeks during the  preceding calendar
year;
(d) Such individual, other than an individual described in paragraph (c) of this subsection:
(A) Is 16 years of age or under and is employed as a hand harvest laborer, is paid on  a piece-
rate basis in an operation  which has been, and is customarily and generally recognized as having
been, paid on a piece-rate basis in the region of employment; and
(B) Is paid at the same piece-rate as employees over 16 years of age on the same farm; or
(e) Such employee is principally engaged in the range production of  livestock and earns a salary
and is paid on a salary basis.
(2) An individual employed in domestic service on a casual basis in or about a family home.
(3) An individual engaged in administrative, executive or professional work who:
(a) Performs predominantly intellectual, managerial or creative tasks;
(b) Exercises discretion and independent judgment; and
(c) Earns a salary and is paid on a salary basis.
(4) An individual employed by the United States.
Enrolled House Bill 3550 (HB 3550-INTRO) Page 1
(5) An individual who is employed by an institution whose function is primary or secondary ed-
ucation, and in which the individual is an enrolled student.
(6) An individual engaged in the capacity of an outside salesperson or taxicab operator.
(7) An individual domiciled at a  place of employment for the purpose of being available for
emergency or occasional duties for time  other than that spent performing these duties, provided that
when the individual performs emergency or occasional duties, the individual must be paid no  less
than the wage specified in ORS 653.025.
(8) An individual paid for  specified hours of employment, the only purpose of which is to be
available for recall to duty.
(9) An individual domiciled at multiunit  accommodations designed to provide other people with
temporary or permanent lodging, for the purpose of  maintenance, management or assisting in the
management of same.
(10) An individual employed on a seasonal basis at:
(a) An organized camp operated for profit that generates gross  annual income of less than
$500,000; or
(b) A nonprofit organized camp.
(11) An individual employed at a nonprofit conference ground or center operated for educational,
charitable or religious purposes.
(12) An individual who performs services as a volunteer firefighter, as defined in ORS 652.050.
(13) An individual who performs child care services in the  home of the individual or in the home
of the child.
(14) An individual employed in domestic service employment in or about a family home  to pro-
vide companionship services for individuals who, because of age or infirmity,  are unable to care for
themselves.
(15) An individual who performs  service as a caddy at a golf course in an established program
for the training and supervision of caddies under the direction  of a person who is an employee of
the golf course.
(16) An individual who volunteers as a golf course marshal if:
(a) The services the individual provides are limited to monitoring starting  times and speed of
play and informing golfers of golf course etiquette;
(b) The individual  is not allowed to provide volunteer golf course marshal services for more than
30 hours in a calendar week; and
(c) The individual receives no wage other than golf passes for providing the volunteer golf
course marshal services.
(17) An individual employed as a resident manager by an adult foster home that is licensed
pursuant to ORS 443.705 to 443.825 and who is domiciled at the adult foster home.
(18) An individual  residing in a mobile home park or manufactured dwelling park designed to
provide other people with temporary  or permanent lodging, for the purpose of maintenance, man-
agement or in assisting in the management of same.
(19) An individual who volunteers as a campground host and who resides in a campground
owned by a public agency that  provides temporary accommodations for travelers, whether under
public or private management, and who provides information and emergency assistance.
(20) An individual who:
(a) Is registered with the National Ski  Patrol or a similar nonprofit ski patrol organization as
a nonprofessional ski patroller and  who receives no wage other than passes authorizing access to
and use  of a ski area, as defined in ORS 30.970, for performing ski patrol services, including but not
limited to services related to preserving the safety  of and providing information to skiers or
snowboarders; or
(b) Receives no wage other than passes  authorizing access to and use of a ski area, as defined
in ORS 30.970, for performing  services directly related to the organizing or conducting of skiing or
snowboarding races or other similar competitions that are:
(A) Sponsored and organized by a nonprofit corporation, as defined in ORS 65.001; and
Enrolled House Bill 3550 (HB 3550-INTRO) Page 2
(B) Held in a ski area, as defined in ORS 30.970.
(21) An individual who has entered into a contract to play minor league  baseball for a
professional sports organization and  who is subject to a collective bargaining agreement, the
terms of which provide for the payment of wages and working conditions.
Passed by House March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3550 (HB 3550-INTRO) Page 3